Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska44-2123
Additional investments authorized.

In addition to investments in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and other securities permitted under Chapter 44, a domestic insurer may also:

(1) Invest, in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and other securities of one or more subsidiaries, amounts which do not exceed the lesser of five percent of such insurer's assets or fifty percent of such insurer's policyholders surplus if, after such investments, the insurer's policyholders surplus will be reasonable in relation to the insurer's outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs. In calculating the amount of such investments, investments in domestic or foreign insurance subsidiaries shall be excluded and there shall be included:

(a) Total net funds or other consideration expended and obligations assumed in the acquisition or formation of a subsidiary, including all organizational expenses and contributions to capital and surplus of such subsidiary whether or not represented by the purchase of capital stock or issuance of other securities; and

(b) All amounts expended in acquiring additional common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and other securities and all contributions to the capital or surplus of a subsidiary subsequent to its acquisition or formation;

(2) Invest any amount in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, and other securities of one or more subsidiaries engaged or organized to engage exclusively in the ownership and management of assets authorized as investments for the insurer if each such subsidiary agrees to limit its investments in any asset so that such investments will not cause the amount of the total investment of the insurer to exceed any of the investment limitations specified in subdivision (1) of this section or in Chapter 44 applicable to the insurer. For purposes of this subdivision, the total investment of the insurer shall include:

(a) Any direct investment by the insurer in an asset; and

(b) The insurer's proportionate share of any investment in an asset by any subsidiary of the insurer, which share shall be calculated by multiplying the amount of the subsidiary's investment by the percentage of the ownership of such subsidiary; and

(3) With the approval of the director, invest any greater amount in common stock, preferred stock, debt obligations, or other securities of one or more subsidiaries if after such investment the insurer's policyholders surplus will be reasonable in relation to the insurer's outstanding liabilities and adequate to its financial needs.

Laws 1991, LB 236, § 4;

Laws 1993, LB 583, § 83.